District of Columbia statutes.
26-1315

Duration of charter.

The charters for incorporations named in this chapter and granted before April 11, 1986, may be made perpetual, or may be limited in time by their provisions, subject to the approval of Congress.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1306, ch. 854, § 727
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63,§ 106(a)(10)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168
1981 Ed., § 26-415.
1973 Ed., § 26-315.